Hawaii statutes.
§431:2-202.5 Approval; when deemed
effective. Except as provided otherwise, any approval required by law
shall be deemed granted on the sixtieth calendar day following the filing of
the request for approval if the commissioner does not take any affirmative
action to grant or deny the approval within sixty calendar days of the request.
[L 2000, c 264, §1; am L 2001, c 121, §1; am L 2011, c 81, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next